en: faiselle
xx: faisselle
ar: فايسيل
el: Φεσέλ
ko: 페셀

en: feta, feta cheese
xx: feta
ar: فيتا
az: Brınza
be: Фета
bg: Бяло саламурено сирене
de: Feta-Käse
el: Φέτα, Τυρί φέτα
eo: Feta-fromaĝo
es: Sirene, queso feta
fa: پنیر فتا
fr: feta, fromage feta
he: פטה
hu: fetasajt, feta sajt
hy: Ֆեթա
id: Keju Sirene
is: Fetaostur
it: feta, formaggio feta
ja: フェタチーズ
kn: ಫ಼ೆಟಾ ಚೀಸ್
ko: 페타
la: Pheta
lt: feta sūris
mk: Бело сирење
pl: Ser szopski, ser feta, feta, sera feta
pt: Sirene
ru: Фета
sr: фета
sv: Fetaost
tr: Beyaz peynir
uk: Фета
zh: 菲達芝士

en: Feta cheese from ewe's milk
fr: Feta de brebis
hr: feta sir od ovčjeg mlijeka
nl: schapemelkfeta

en: fontina, fontina cheese
xx: Fontina
ar: فونتينا
de: Fontina
es: fontina, queso fontina
fr: Fontine
it: Fontina
ja: フォンティーナ
ko: 폰티나
ru: Фонтина
uk: Фонтіна
zh: 芳提娜芝士

en: fontina AOP
xx: Fontina AOP
de: Fontina g.U.
fr: Fontine AOP, Fontine DOP
it: Fontina DOP

en: fontal, fontal cheese
de: Fontal, Fontal Käse
es: fontal
fr: fontal, fromage fontal
hr: fontana
it: fontal

en: gorgonzola, gorgonzola cheese
xx: gorgonzola
ar: جبنة غورغونزولا
be: Гаргандзола
bg: Горгондзола
bo: གོར་གོན་ཟོ་ལ།
cv: Горгонзола
de: Gorgonzola, Gorgonzola PDO
el: Γκοργκοντζόλα
eo: Gorgonzolo
es: Gorgonzolo
et: Gorgonzola juust
eu: Gorgonzola
fa: گورگونتزولا
fi: gorgonzolajuusto
fr: fromage gorgonzola, gorgonzola AOP, fromage gorgonzola AOP
he: גורגונזולה
hy: Գորգոնձոլա
it: formaggio gorgonzola
ja: ゴルゴンゾーラ
ko: 고르곤졸라
mk: Горгонѕола
pl: Gorgonzola ChNP, ser Gorgonzola ChNP
ro: Brânză Gorgonzola
ru: Горгондзола
sd: گارگونزولا
sl: gorgonzola, sir gorgonzola
sr: горгонзола
uk: Ґорґонцола
zh: 古岡左拉芝士

en: gouda, gouda cheese, Gouda cheese from cow's milk
xx: Gouda
af: Goudakaas
ar: جودة
az: Quda
bg: Гауда
ca: formatge gouda
cv: Гауда
da: gouda-ost
de: Gouda, Gouda-Käse
el: Γκούντα
eo: Gaŭdo-fromaĝo
es: queso gouda
eu: Gouda gazta
fa: پنیر گودا
fi: goudajuusto, goudajuustoa
he: חאודה
hr: gouda, gouda sir
hu: gouda sajt
hy: Գաուդա
id: Keju Gouda
ja: ゴーダチーズ
ko: 하우다 치즈
lt: Gaudos sūris
ms: Keju Gouda
nb: Goudaost
nn: Goudaost
pl: gouda, ser gouda
ru: Гауда
sl: Gavda
tr: Gouda peyniri
uk: Гауда
zh: 豪达奶酪

en: Grana Padano, Grana Padano cheese, Grana Padano cheese from cow's milk, cheese grana padano
xx: Grana Padano
bg: Грана Падано
ca: Grana Padano, formatge Grana Padano
cv: Грана Падано
da: Grana Padano, Grana Padano ost
eo: Грана Падано
es: Grana Padano, queso Grana Padano
fi: Grana Padano, Grana Padano -juusto
fr: grana padano, fromage grana padano
hr: sir grana padano, sir grana padano DOP
hu: Grana Padano, Grana Padano sajt
it: Grana Padano, formaggio grana padano
ja: グラナ・パダーノ
ko: 그라나 파다노
nl: Grana Padano, Grana Padano kaas
ru: Грана падано
sl: ribani trdi sir Grana Padano
uk: Грана Падано
zh: 格拉娜·帕達諾芝士

en: Grana Padano PDO cheese, grana padano cheese pdo
bg: сирене Грана Падано ЗГН
ca: formatge grana padano DOP
de: Grana Padano g.U. Käse, Grana Padano Käse g.U.
es: queso grana padano DOP, queso DOP Grana Padano
fi: Grana Padano SAN, Grana Padano -juusto SAN
fr: fromage grana padano aop, grana padano dop, Grana Padano AOP
hr: grana padano sir ZOI
it: grana padano dop, formaggio grana padano dop
pt: queijo Grana Padano DOP
sv: Grana Padano-ost D O P

en: gruyère, Gruyere cheese, Gruyere cheese from cow's milk
xx: Gruyère
az: Qruyer
bg: Грюер, сирене Грюер
de: Greyerzer
el: Γκρουγιέρ
es: gruyer
eu: Gruyère gazta
he: גרוייר
hu: Gruyère sajt, Gruyere
it: Gruviera
ja: グリュイエールチーズ
ko: 그뤼예르
lt: Grujer
ru: Грюйер
sl: Grojer
sr: Grijer
th: เนยแข็งกรูว์แยร์
tr: Gravyer peyniri
uk: Грюєр

en: gruyère AOP
xx: Gruyère AOP
ca: gruyère DOP
es: gruyer DOP

en: gruyere pgi, Gruyere cheese France Protected Geographical Indication from cow's milk
fr: Gruyère IGP, Gruyère IGP France
hr: gruyere pgi
it: gruyere igp

en: Havarti, Havarti cheeses
bg: Хаварти
ca: Havarti
da: Havarti
de: Havarti
es: Havarti, Queso Havarti
et: Havarti
eu: Havarti
fi: Havarti
fr: Havarti
hr: havarti
id: Havarti
is: Havarti
it: Havarti
ja: ハバーティ
jv: Havarti
ko: 하바르티
nb: Havarti
nl: Havarti
nn: Havarti
pl: Havarti
ro: Havarti
ru: Хаварти
tr: Havarti
zh: 哈瓦蒂芝士

en: jarlsberg, jarlsberg cheese
hr: jarlsberg
it: jarlsberg

en: Lancashire cheese
bg: Ланкашър
de: Lancashire, Lancashire-Käse
fr: fromage lancashire, fromage lancashire au lait pasteurisé
hr: lancashire sir
it: formaggio Lancashire

en: langres
xx: langres
ar: لانجريس تشيس
ru: Лангр
tr: Langres peyniri
uk: Лангр
zh: 朗格勒奶酪

en: livarot
xx: livarot
ar: ليڤاروت
fr: livarot de Normandie AOP
ja: リヴァロ
ko: 리바로
os: Ливаро
ru: Ливаро
uk: Ліваро
zh: 里伐羅特芝士

en: maasdam, maasdam cheese
xx: Maasdam
af: Maasdamkaas
ar: ماسدام
bg: Маасдам
ca: formatge maasdam
da: Maasdammer
de: Maasdamer
es: Queso maasdam
eu: Maasdam gazta
hu: Maasdamer, maasdam
nl: maasdammer, Maasdammer kaas
pl: Mazdamer
ru: Маасдам
uk: Маасдам

en: reduced fat Maasdam-type firm cheese with around 14% fat
fr: fromage type Maasdam 14% MG
hr: smanjeni masni čvrsti sir tipa maasdam s oko 14% masti